District of Columbia statutes.
6-916

Violation of § 6-903, § 6-904, § 6-905, § 6-907, § 6-911, § 6-912, or § 6-915.

(a)

Any person violating or aiding or abetting in violating § 6-903, § 6-904, § 6-905, § 6-907, § 6-911, § 6-912, or § 6-915 shall, upon conviction thereof in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon information filed in the name of said District, be punished by a fine of not more than $100 or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days; and each day on which such unlawful act is done or during which such unlawful negligence continues shall constitute a separate and distinct offense. Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction by any person violating or aiding and abetting in violating § 6-903, § 6-904, § 6-905, § 6-907, § 6-911, § 6-912, or § 6-915, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of these sections, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

(b)

All fees and penalties collected under this chapter shall be deposited in the fund established by § 42-3131.01(b) and shall be expended for the general administration of the Board.

May 1, 1906, 34 Stat. 161, ch. 2073, § 16
Aug. 28, 1954, 68 Stat. 889, ch. 1032
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 440, 32 DCR 4450
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 2072(d), 51 DCR 8441

History

This section is referenced in § 6-907, § 6-915, and § 42-3131.01.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 5-716.
1973 Ed., § 5-631.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 15-205 designated the existing text as subsection (a); and added subsec. (b).

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072(d) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2072(d) of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Emergency Legislation